src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kiiql_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kīʼl: # Noun 128 'eng /est pant/fin' - full paradigm
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Nom: [kīʼl, kīl]
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Gen: [kīʼl, kīl]
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Par: [kīʼlõ, kīlõ]
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Dat: [kīʼlõn, kīlõn]
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Ins: [kīʼlõks, kīlõks]
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Ill: [kīʼlõ, kīlõ]
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Ela: [kīʼlstõ, kīlstõ]
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Nom: [kīʼlõd, kīlõd]
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Gen: [kīʼlõd, kīlõd]
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Par: [kīʼlidi, kīlidi]
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Dat: [kīʼlõdõn, kīlõdõn]
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Ins: [kīʼlõdõks, kīlõdõks]
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Ill: [kīʼliž, kīliž]
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Ela: [kīʼlist, kīlist]
